North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
§ 116-11.1.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-37

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 6.

§ 116-11.2.
Duties regarding programs in education administration.

The Board of Governors shall direct the constituent institutions with programs in education administration to revise the programs to reflect any increased standards required for programs approved by the State Board of Education, including new requirements for school-based leadership in the public schools. The Board of Governors shall monitor the programs and devise an assessment plan for all programs leading to certification in education administration.

History.

1991, c. 689, s. 200(e).

§ 116-11.3.
UNC admissions policy for early college graduates.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall adopt a policy to require each constituent institution to offer to any student who graduated from a cooperative innovative high school program with an associate degree and who applies for admission to the constituent institution the option of being considered for admission as a freshman or as a transfer student. The constituent institution shall also provide written information to the student regarding the consequences that accompany each option and any other relevant information that may be helpful to the student when considering which option to select.

Beginning September 30, 2017, the Board of Governors shall report annually to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee regarding the number of students who graduated from a cooperative innovative high school program with an associate degree and which option was chosen by those students when applying for admission to a constituent institution.

History.

2015-241, s. 11.16(a), (b); 2017-68, s. 5(a).

§ 116-12.
Property and obligations.

All property of whatsoever kind and all rights and privileges held by the Board of Higher Education and by the Boards of Trustees of Appalachian State University, East Carolina University, Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, North Carolina Central University, North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” Pembroke State University, redesignated effective July 1, 1996, as the “University of North Carolina at Pembroke”, Western Carolina University and Winston-Salem State University, as said property, rights and privileges may exist immediately prior to July 1, 1972, shall be, and hereby are, effective July 1, 1972, transferred to and vested in the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina. All obligations of whatsoever kind of the Board of Higher Education and of the Boards of Trustees of Appalachian State University, East Carolina University, Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, North Carolina Central University, North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” Pembroke State University, redesignated effective July 1, 1996, as the “University of North Carolina at Pembroke”, Western Carolina University and Winston-Salem State University, as said obligations may exist immediately prior to July 1, 1972, shall be, and the same hereby are, effective July 1, 1972, transferred to and assumed by the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina. Any property, real or personal, held immediately prior to July 1, 1972, by a board of trustees of a constituent institution for the benefit of that institution or by the University of North Carolina for the benefit of any one or more of its six institutions, shall from and after July 1, 1972, be kept separate and distinct from other property held by the Board of Governors, shall continue to be held for the benefit of the institution or institutions that were previously the beneficiaries and shall continue to be held subject to the provisions of the respective instruments, grants or other means or process by which any property right was acquired. All property of whatsoever kind and all rights and privileges held by the Board of Trustees of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics, as said property, rights and privileges may exist immediately prior to July 1, 2007, shall be and hereby are, effective July 1, 2007, transferred to and vested in the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. All obligations of whatsoever kind of the Board of Trustees of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics as said obligations may exist immediately prior to July 1, 2007, shall be, and the same hereby are, effective July 1, 2007, transferred to and assumed by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. In case a conflict arises as to which property, rights or privileges were held for the beneficial interest of a particular institution, or as to the extent to which such property, rights or privileges were so held, the Board of Governors shall determine the issue, and the determination of the Board shall constitute final administrative action. Nothing in this Article shall be deemed to increase or diminish the income, other revenue or specific property which is pledged, or otherwise hypothecated, for the security or liquidation of any obligations, it being the intent that the Board of Governors shall assume said obligations without thereby either enlarging or diminishing the rights of the holders thereof.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 603, s. 4; 2006-66, s. 9.11(c); 2008-192, s. 4.

§ 116-13.
Powers of Board regarding property and services subject to general law.

The power and authority granted to the Board of Governors with regard to the acquisition, operation, maintenance and disposition of real and personal property and services shall be subject to, and exercised in accordance with, the provisions of Chapters 143 and 146 of the General Statutes and related sections of the North Carolina Administrative Code, except when a purchase is being made that is not covered by a State term contract and either:

The funds used to procure personal property or services are not moneys appropriated from the General Fund or received as tuition or, in the case of multiple fund sources, moneys appropriated from the General Fund or received as tuition do not exceed thirty percent (30%) of the total funds; or

The funds used to procure personal property or services are contract and grant funds or, in the case of multiple fund sources, the contract and grant funds exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total funds.When a special responsibility constituent institution makes a purchase under subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, the requirements of Chapter 143, Article 3 shall apply, except the approval or oversight of the Secretary of Administration or the State Purchasing Officer is not required, regardless of dollar value.

Special responsibility constituent institutions shall have the authority to purchase equipment, materials, supplies, and services from sources other than those certified by the Secretary of Administration on term contracts, subject to the following conditions:

The purchase price, including the cost of delivery, is less than the cost under the State term contract;

The items are the same or substantially similar in quality, service, and performance as items available under State term contracts;

The cost of the purchase shall not exceed the benchmark established under

G.S. 116-31.10

; and

The special responsibility constituent institution notifies the Department of Administration of purchases consistently being made under this provision so that State term contracts may be improved.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 2003-228, s. 1; 2013-234, s. 6.

§ 116-13.1.
Capital facilities; reports.

The General Assembly finds that although The University of North Carolina is one of the State’s most valuable assets, the current facilities of the University have been allowed to deteriorate due to decades of neglect and have unfortunately fallen into a state of disrepair because of inadequate attention to maintenance. It is the intent of the General Assembly to reverse this trend and to provide a mechanism to assure that the University’s capital assets are adequately maintained. The General Assembly commits to responsible stewardship of these assets to protect their value over the years, as follows:

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall require each constituent and affiliated institution to monitor the condition of its facilities and their needs or repair and renovation, and to assure that all necessary maintenance is carried out within funds available.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 9.4(e), effective July 1, 2012.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to assure that adequate oversight, funding, and accountability are continually provided so that the capital facilities of the University are properly maintained to preserve the level of excellence the citizens of this State deserve. To this end, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee shall report to the General Assembly annually its recommendations for legislative changes to implement this policy.

Equity in University Improvements. — The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall continue to study and monitor any inequities in funding for capital improvements and facilities needs which may still exist on North Carolina’s Public Historically Black Colleges and Universities and North Carolina’s Historically American Indian University, the University of North Carolina at Pembroke, beyond the funding of the projects provided for in this act, and shall report annually to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on any remaining inequities found, including recommendations as to how those inequities should be addressed.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 36.6, effective July 1, 2014.

History.

2000-3, ss. 1.1, 8; 2005-153, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 9.6C; 2012-142, s. 9.4(e); 2013-360, s. 36.10; 2014-100, s. 36.6.

§ 116-13.2.
Report on University Fiscal Liabilities.

The Board of Governors shall report on an annual basis to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on:

Any financing of buildings or other facilities, regardless of the ownership of those buildings or other facilities, located on land owned by The University of North Carolina or the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina; and

All fiscal liabilities or contingent liabilities, including payments for debt service or other contractual arrangements, of The University of North Carolina or any constituent institution.

History.

2002-126, s. 9.16.

§ 116-14.
President and staff.

The Board shall elect a President of the University of North Carolina. The President shall be the chief administrative officer of the University.

(a1)

The Board shall use the following process whenever the Board conducts a search for a President of The University of North Carolina:

At least three final candidates shall be submitted to the full Board from which the full Board shall make its selection for the President.

The Board shall conduct a vote on the selection of the President and the candidate shall receive a majority of votes of the entire Board in order to be elected President of The University of North Carolina.

(a2)

The Board may appoint an interim President. Subsection (a1) of this section shall not apply to the appointment of an interim President under this subsection. The Interim President shall serve until the Board appoints a President of The University of North Carolina using the procedures specified in subsection (a1) of this section.

The President shall be assisted by such professional staff members as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article, who shall be elected by the Board on nomination of the President. The Board shall fix the compensation of the staff members it elects. These staff members shall include a senior vice-president and such other vice-presidents and officers as may be deemed desirable. Provision shall be made for persons of high competence and strong professional experience in such areas as academic affairs, public service programs, business and financial affairs, institutional studies and long-range planning, student affairs, research, legal affairs, health affairs and institutional development, and for State and federal programs administered by the Board. In addition, the President shall be assisted by such other employees as may be needed to carry out the provisions of this Article, who shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes. The staff complement shall be established by the Board on recommendation of the President to insure that there are persons on the staff who have the professional competence and experience to carry out the duties assigned and to insure that there are persons on the staff who are familiar with the problems and capabilities of all of the principal types of institutions represented in the system. Subject to approval by the Board, the President may establish and abolish employment positions within the staff complement authorized by this subsection in the manner of and under the conditions prescribed by

G.S. 116-30.4

for special responsibility constituent institutions.

(b1)

The President shall receive General Fund appropriations made by the General Assembly for continuing operations of The University of North Carolina that are administered by the President and the President’s staff complement established pursuant to

G.S. 116-14(b)

in the form of a single sum to Budget Code 16010 of The University of North Carolina in the manner and under the conditions prescribed by

G.S. 116-30.2

. The President, with respect to the foregoing appropriations, shall have the same duties and responsibilities that are prescribed by

G.S. 116-30.2

for the Chancellor of a special responsibility constituent institution. The President may establish procedures for transferring funds from Budget Code 16010 to the constituent institutions for nonrecurring expenditures. The President may identify funds for capital improvement projects from Budget Code 16010, and the capital improvement projects may be established following the procedures set out in

G.S. 143C-8-8

and

G.S. 143C-8-9

.

(b2)

The President, in consultation with the State Auditor and the Director of the Office of State Human Resources, shall ascertain that the management staff and internal financial controls are in place and continue in place to successfully administer the additional authority authorized under

G.S. 116-14(b1)

and

G.S. 116-30.3

. All actions taken by the President pursuant to

G.S. 116-14(b1)

and

G.S. 116-30.3

are subject to audit by the State Auditor.

(b3)

The President shall have the authority to approve a reduction in force for positions subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act in accordance with the reduction in force policies of the Office of State Human Resources without further approval by any other State agency. The President may delegate this authority to approve a reduction in force to a chancellor of a constituent institution. The authority to approve a reduction in force may include reorganization and payment of severance with non-State funds. The President and any chancellor of a constituent institution who approves a reduction in force pursuant to this section shall comply with the following:

Submit an annual informational report to the Office of State Human Resources on all approved reductions in force, reorganizations, and severance payments for employees who are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act under this section.

If State funds are used for payment of severance in connection with a reduction in force under this section, the payment of the severance shall be subject to any required preapproval by the Office of State Budget and Management.

The President, with the approval of the Board, shall appoint an advisory committee composed of representative presidents of the private colleges and universities and may appoint such additional advisory committees as are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1999-237, s. 10.14(b); 2000-140, s. 26; 2006-203, s. 41; 2007-117, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2014-100, s. 11.17(b); 2015-300, s. 1.5; 2021-80, s. 6.

§ 116-15.
Licensing of certain nonpublic post-secondary educational institutions.

(a1)

The General Assembly of North Carolina in recognition of the importance of higher education and of the particular significance attached to the personal credentials accessible through higher education and in consonance with statutory law of this State making unlawful any “unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce,” hereby declares it the policy of this State that all institutions conducting post-secondary degree activity in this State that are not subject to Chapter 115 or 115D of the General Statutes, nor some other section of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes shall be subject to licensure under this section except as the institution or a particular activity of the institution may be exempt from licensure by one or another provision of this section.

(a2)

Definitions. —

As used in this section the following terms are defined as set forth in this subsection:

“Post-secondary degree”. — A credential conferring on the recipient thereof the title of “Associate”, “Bachelor”, “Master”, or “Doctor”, or an equivalent title, signifying educational attainment based on (i) study, (ii) a substitute for study in the form of equivalent experience or achievement testing, or (iii) a combination of the foregoing; provided, that “post-secondary degree” shall not include any honorary degree or other so-called “unearned” degree.

“Institution”. — Any sole proprietorship, group, partnership, venture, society, company, corporation, school, college, or university that engages in, purports to engage in, or intends to engage in any type of post-secondary degree activity.

“Post-secondary degree activity”. — Any of the following is “post-secondary degree activity”:

Awarding a post-secondary degree.

Conducting or offering study, experience, or testing for an individual or certifying prior successful completion by an individual of study, experience, or testing, under the representation that the individual successfully completing the study, experience, or testing will be awarded therefor, at least in part, a post-secondary degree.

“Publicly registered name”. — The name of any sole proprietorship, group, partnership, venture, society, company, corporation, school, college, or institution that appears as the subject of any Articles of Incorporation, Articles of Amendment, or Certificate of Authority to Transact Business or to Conduct Affairs, properly filed with the Secretary of State of North Carolina and currently in force.

“Board”. — The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.

(b)

Required License. —

No institution subject to this section shall undertake post-secondary degree activity in this State, whether through itself or through an agent, unless the institution is licensed as provided in this section to conduct post-secondary degree activity or is exempt from licensure under this section as hereinafter provided.

(c)

Exemption from Licensure. —

Any institution that has been continuously conducting post-secondary degree activity in this State under the same publicly registered name or series of publicly registered names since July 1, 1972, shall be exempt from the provisions for licensure under this section upon presentation to the Board of information acceptable to the Board to substantiate such post-secondary degree activity and public registration of the institution’s names. Any institution that, pursuant to a predecessor statute to this subsection, had presented to the Board proof of activity and registration such that the Board granted exemption from licensure, shall continue to enjoy such exemption without further action by the Board.

(d)

Exemption of Institutions Relative to Religious Education. —

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no institution shall be subject to licensure under this section with respect to post-secondary degree activity based upon a program of study, equivalent experience, or achievement testing the institutionally planned objective of which is the attainment of a degree in theology, divinity, or religious education or in any other program of study, equivalent experience, or achievement testing that is designed by the institution primarily for career preparation in a religious vocation. This exemption shall be extended to any institution with respect to each program of study, equivalent experience, and achievement test that the institution demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Board should be exempt under this subsection.

(e)

Post-secondary Degree Activity within the Armed Forces of the United States. —

To the extent that an institution undertakes post-secondary degree activity on the premises of military posts or reservations located in this State for military personnel stationed on active duty there, or their dependents, the institution shall be exempt from the licensure requirements of this section.

(f)

Standards for Licensure. —

To receive a license to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State, an institution shall satisfy the Board that the institution has met the following standards:

(1)

That the institution is State-chartered. If chartered by a state or sovereignty other than North Carolina, the institution shall also obtain a Certificate of Authority to Transact Business or to Conduct Affairs in North Carolina issued by the Secretary of State of North Carolina;

(2)

That the institution has been conducting post-secondary degree activity in a state or sovereignty other than North Carolina during consecutive, regular-term, academic semesters, exclusive of summer sessions, for at least the two years immediately prior to submitting an application for licensure under this section, or has been conducting with enrolled students, for a like period in this State or some other state or sovereignty, post-secondary educational activity not related to a post-secondary degree; provided, that an institution may be temporarily relieved of this standard under the conditions set forth in subsection (i), below;

(3)

That the substance of each course or program of study, equivalent experience, or achievement test is such as may reasonably and adequately achieve the stated objective for which the study, experience, or test is offered or to be certified as successfully completed;

(4)

That the institution has adequate space, equipment, instructional materials, and personnel available to it to provide education of good quality;

(5)

That the education, experience, and other qualifications of directors, administrators, supervisors, and instructors are such as may reasonably insure that the students will receive, or will be reliably certified to have received, education consistent with the stated objectives of any course or program of study, equivalent experience, or achievement test offered by the institution;

That the institution provides students and other interested persons with a catalog or brochure containing information describing the substance, objectives, and duration of the study, equivalent experience, and achievement testing offered, a schedule of related tuition, fees, and all other necessary charges and expenses, cancellation and refund policies, and such other material facts concerning the institution and the program or course of study, equivalent experience, and achievement testing as are reasonably likely to affect the decision of the student to enroll therein, together with any other disclosures that may be specified by the Board; and that such information is provided to prospective students prior to enrollment;

That upon satisfactory completion of study, equivalent experience, or achievement test, the student is given appropriate educational credentials by the institution, indicating that the relevant study, equivalent experience, or achievement testing has been satisfactorily completed by the students;

That records are maintained by the institution adequate to reflect the application of relevant performance or grading standards to each enrolled student;

That the institution is maintained and operated in compliance with all pertinent ordinances and laws, including rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, relative to the safety and health of all persons upon the premises of the institution;

That the institution is financially sound and capable of fulfilling its commitments to students and that the institution has provided a bond as provided in subsection (f1) of this section;

That the institution, through itself or those with whom it may contract, does not engage in promotion, sales, collection, credit, or other practices of any type which are false, deceptive, misleading, or unfair;

That the chief executive officer, trustees, directors, owners, administrators, supervisors, staff, instructors, and employees of the institution have no record of unprofessional conduct or incompetence that would reasonably call into question the overall quality of the institution;

That the student housing owned, maintained, or approved by the institution, if any, is appropriate, safe, and adequate;

That the institution has a fair and equitable cancellation and refund policy; and

That no person or agency with whom the institution contracts has a record of unprofessional conduct or incompetence that would reasonably call into question the overall quality of the institution.

(f1) (1)

A guaranty bond is required for each institution that is licensed. The Board may revoke the license of an institution that fails to maintain a bond pursuant to this subsection.If the institution has provided a bond pursuant to

G.S. 115D-95

, the Board may waive the bond requirement under this subsection. The Board may not waive the bond requirement under this subsection if the applicant has provided an alternative to a guaranty bond under

G.S. 115D-95

(c).

(2)

When application is made for a license or license renewal, the applicant shall file a guaranty bond with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the institution will be located. The bond shall be in favor of the students. The bond shall be executed by the applicant as principal and by a bonding company authorized to do business in this State. The bond shall be conditioned to provide indemnification to any student, or his parent or guardian, who has suffered a loss of tuition or any fees by reason of the failure of the institution to offer or complete student instruction, academic services, or other goods and services related to course enrollment for any reason, including the suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of an institution’s license, bankruptcy, foreclosure, or the institution ceasing to operate.The bond shall be in an amount determined by the Board to be adequate to provide indemnification to any student, or his parent or guardian, under the terms of the bond. The bond amount for an institution shall be at least equal to the maximum amount of prepaid tuition held at any time during the last fiscal year by the institution. The bond amount shall also be at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000).Each application for a license shall include a letter signed by an authorized representative of the institution showing in detail the calculations made and the method of computing the amount of the bond, pursuant to this subdivision and the rules of the Board. If the Board finds that the calculations made and the method of computing the amount of the bond are inaccurate or that the amount of the bond is otherwise inadequate to provide indemnification under the terms of the bond, the Board may require the applicant to provide an additional bond.The bond shall remain in force and effect until cancelled by the guarantor. The guarantor may cancel the bond upon 30 days notice to the Board. Cancellation of the bond shall not affect any liability incurred or accrued prior to the termination of the notice period.

(g)

Review of Licensure. —

Any institution that acquires licensure under this section shall be subject to review by the Board to determine that the institution continues to meet the standard for licensure of subsection (f), above. Review of such licensure by the Board shall always occur if the institution is legally reconstituted, or if ownership of a preponderance of all the assets of the institution changes pursuant to a single transaction or agreement or a recognizable sequence of transactions or agreements, or if two years has elapsed since licensure of the institution was granted by the Board.Notwithstanding the foregoing paragraph, if an institution has continued to be licensed under this section and continuously conducted post-secondary degree activity in this State under the same publicly registered name or series of publicly registered names since July 1, 1979, or for six consecutive years, whichever is the shorter period, and is accredited by an accrediting commission recognized by the Council on Post-Secondary Accreditation, such institution shall be subject to licensure review by the Board every six years to determine that the institution continues to meet the standard for licensure of subsection (f), above. However, should such an institution cease to maintain the specified accreditation, become legally reconstituted, have ownership of a preponderance of all its assets transferred pursuant to a single transaction or agreement or a recognizable sequence of transactions or agreements to a person or organization not licensed under this section, or fail to meet the standard for licensure of subsection (f), above, then the institution shall be subject to licensure review by the Board every two years until a license to conduct post-secondary degree activity and the requisite accreditation have been restored for six consecutive years.

(h)

Denial and Revocation of Licensure. —

Any institution seeking licensure under the provisions of this section that fails to meet the licensure requirements of this section shall be denied a license to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State. Any institution holding a license to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State that is found by the Board of Governors not to satisfy the licensure requirements of this section shall have its license to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State revoked by the Board; provided, that the Board of Governors may continue in force the license of an institution deemed by the Board to be making substantial and expeditious progress toward remedying its licensure deficiencies.

(i)

Regulatory Authority in the Board. —

The Board shall have authority to establish such rules, regulations, and procedures as it may deem necessary or appropriate to effect the provisions of this section. Such rules, regulations, and procedures may include provision for the granting of an interim permit to conduct post-secondary degree activity in this State to an institution seeking licensure but lacking the two-year period of activity prescribed by subsection (f)(2), above.

(j)

Enforcement Authority in the Attorney General. —

The Board shall call to the attention of the Attorney General, for such action as he may deem appropriate, any institution failing to comply with the requirements of this section.

(k)

Severability. —

The provisions of this section are severable, and, if any provision of this section is declared unconstitutional or invalid by the courts, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the section as a whole or any provision other than the provision so declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 268; 1977, c. 563, ss. 1-4; 1979, c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1006; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 824, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27; 2011-183, s. 81.

Local Modification.

Cabarrus College of Health Sciences: 2007-113, s. 1(b); Cabarrus Memorial Hospital (known as Northeast Medical Center after July 1, 2007): 1998-204, as amended by 2004-67, as amended by 2007-113, s. 1(a), as amended by 2007-484, s. 41.

§ 116-16.
Tax exemption.

The lands and other property belonging to the University of North Carolina shall be exempt from all kinds of public taxation.

History.

Const., art. 5, s. 5; 1789, c. 306, s. 3; P.R; R.S., vol. 2, p. 428; Code, s. 2614; Rev., s. 4262; C.S., s. 5783; 1971, c. 1244, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1978 law on taxation, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1142 (1979).

For note on the rejection of the “public purpose” requirement for state tax exemption, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 293 (1981).

§ 116-17.
Purchase of annuity or retirement income contracts for faculty members, officers and employees.

Notwithstanding any provision of law relating to salaries and/or salary schedules for the pay of faculty members, administrative officers, or any other employees of universities, colleges, constituent institutions, and other institutions of higher learning as named and set forth in this Article, and other State agencies qualified as educational institutions under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, the governing boards of any such universities, colleges, constituent institutions, and other institutions of higher learning may authorize the business officer or agent of same to enter into annual contracts with any of the faculty members, administrative officers and employees of said institutions which provide for a reduction in salary below the total established compensation or salary schedule for a term of one year. The financial officer or agent shall use the funds derived from the reduction in the salary of the faculty member, administrative officer or employee to purchase a nonforfeitable annuity or retirement income contract for the benefit of said faculty member, administrative officer or employee of said universities, colleges and institutions. A faculty member, administrative officer or employee who has agreed to a salary reduction for this purpose shall not have the right to receive the amount of the salary reduction in cash or in any other way except the annuity or retirement income contract. Funds used for the purchase of an annuity or retirement income contract shall not be in lieu of any amount earned by the faculty member, administrative officer or employee before his election for a salary reduction has become effective. The agreement for salary reductions referred to herein shall be effected under any necessary regulations and procedures adopted by the various governing boards of the various institutions and on forms prepared by said governing boards. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or law, the amount by which the salary of any faculty member, administrative officer or employee is reduced pursuant to this section shall not be excluded, but shall be included, in computing and making payroll deductions for social security and retirement system purposes, and in computing and providing matching funds for retirement system purposes.

In lieu of the annuity and related contracts provided for under this section, interests in custodial accounts pursuant to Section 401(f), Section 403(b)(7), and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended may be purchased for the benefit of qualified employees under this section with the funds derived from the reduction in the salaries of such employees.

History.

1965, c. 365; 1971, c. 1244, s. 3; 1989, c. 526, s. 3; 2006-66, s. 9.11(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(d), effective July 1, 2007, in the first paragraph, substituted “colleges, constituent institutions” for “colleges” twice, added “other” preceding “institutions of higher learning” twice, and deleted “of higher learning” following “employees of said institutions” near the end, in the second sentence, substituted “institutions” for “institutions of higher learning,” and
deleted “of higher learning” following “boards of the various institutions” in the next-to-last sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. H.L. Ferguson, Jr., University of North Carolina at Greensboro, 42 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 6 (1972).

§ 116-17.1.
Dependent care assistance program.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina is authorized to provide eligible employees of constituent institutions a program of dependent care assistance as available under Section 129 and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The Board of Governors may authorize constituent institutions to enter into annual agreements with employees who elect to participate in the program to provide for a reduction in salary. With the approval of the Director of the Budget, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may be used to pay some or all of the administrative expenses of the program. Should the Board of Governors decide to contract with a third party to administer the terms and conditions of a program of dependent care assistance, it may select a contractor only upon a thorough and completely competitive procurement process.

History.

1989, c. 458, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 14(d); 1993, c. 561, s. 42; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.28A; 1997-443, s. 33.20(a); 1999-237, s. 28.27(a).